Washington statutes.
RCW 4.56.080

Judgment in action to recover personal property.

In an action to recover the possession of personal property, judgment for the plaintiff may be for the possession or value thereof, in case a delivery cannot be had, and damages for the detention. If the property has been delivered to the plaintiff, and the defendant claim a return thereof, judgment for the defendant may be for a return of the property, or the value thereof, in case a return cannot be had, and damages for taking and withholding the same.

[Code 1881 s 304; 1877 p 62 s 308; 1869 p 75 s 306; 1854 p 173 s 232; RRS s 434.]